Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB432.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2023-A. Educational Opportunities for Foster and A dopted Children.--(a) An institution shall provide each eligible nonresident student who enrolls FULL TIME with a fostering independence waiver for IN-PERSON undergraduate courses FOR THE FIRST TIME beginning with the semester starting in fall 2025 2027 . (b) To be eligible for a fostering independence waiver an individual must:<--<--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920 (1) Be eligible for a Chafee Education and Training Grant under the Foster Care Independence Act of 1999 (Public Law 106-169, 113 Stat. 1822).(2) Have experienced foster care at sixteen years of age or older or, after attaining sixteen years of age, exited foster care to adoption or permanent legal custodianship.(3) Apply for Federal and State grants. (c) The fostering independence waiver shall be available for up to five years, whether or not consecutive, or until the individual reaches twenty-six years of age BY JULY 1 OF THE UPCOMING ACADEMIC YEAR , whichever occurs first. (d) An institution shall annually BY DECEMBER 31, 2028, AND BY DECEMBER 31 EACH YEAR THEREAFTER report the number of students who enroll and receive a fostering independence waiver under this section to the system, and the system shall report the information to the Governor, the Department of Education, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and , the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives . , THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.(e) For the purposes of this section, the term "fostering independence waiver" means an amount equal to the waiver of tuition and mandatory fees after the subtraction of the amount of any Federal grants, State grants and other scholarships or grants an individual receives.(E) THE SYSTEM, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE INSTITUTIONS, SHALL DEVELOP UNIFORM GUIDELINES, INCLUDING, AT A MINIMUM, 20250SB0432PN1209 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INSTRUCTIONS FOR HOW A NONRESIDENT STUDENT MAY APPLY FOR A FOSTERING INDEPENDENCE WAIVER AND HOW AN INSTITUTION MAY VERIFY A NONRESIDENT STUDENT'S STATUS AS FOSTER CARE ELIGIBLE UNDER THE CHAFEE EDUCATION AND TRAINING GRANT PROGRAM WITH THE AGENCY.(F) AN INSTITUTION SHALL:(1) TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, INDEPENDENTLY VERIFY A NONRESIDENT STUDENT'S STATUS AS FOSTER CARE ELIGIBLE UNDER THE CHAFEE EDUCATION AND TRAINING GRANT PROGRAM OR ACCESS ANOTHER STATE'S FOSTER CARE OR ELIGIBILITY RECORDS WITH PROPER AUTHORIZATION. AN INSTITUTION MAY PERMIT A NONRESIDENT STUDENT TO SELF-DISCLOSE CHAFEE EDUCATION AND TRAINING GRANT ELIGIBILITY WITHOUT VERIFICATION IF AGENCY VERIFICATION CANNOT BE OBTAINED. A UNIVERSITY MAY DENY, SUSPEND OR REVOKE A FOSTERING INDEPENDENCE WAIVER IF A STUDENT IS FOUND TO HAVE FALSIFIED THEIR ELIGIBILITY.(2) MONITOR A FOSTERING INDEPENDENCE WAIVER RECIPIENT'S ELIGIBILITY AND ACADEMIC PROGRESS.(G) FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE TERM "FOSTERING INDEPENDENCE WAIVER" MEANS AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE WAIVER OF TUITION AND MANDATORY FEES AFTER THE SUBTRACTION OF THE AMOUNT OF ANY FEDERAL GRANTS, STATE GRANTS AND OTHER SCHOLARSHIPS OR GRANTS AN INDIVIDUAL RECEIVES.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0432PN1209 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223